Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.7511, is amended to read: 239.7511 GAS TAX SIGN ON PETROLEUM DISPENSERnew text begin AND SALES RECEIPTnew text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Gas tax sign on petroleum dispenser. new text end (a) The director must ensure that signs having 12-point font or greater are affixed on retail petroleum dispensers as follows: (1) for regular or premium gasoline, a sign that reads: "The price for each gallon of gasoline includes the current state gasoline tax of 28.5 cents per gallon and federal gasoline tax of 18.4 cents per gallon. Revenue from the state fuel tax may be used only for roads and bridges, according to the Minnesota Constitution."; and (2) for diesel fuel, a sign that reads: "The price for each gallon of diesel fuel includes the current state gasoline tax of 28.5 cents per gallon and federal gasoline tax of 24.4 cents per gallon. Revenue from the state fuel tax may be used only for roads and bridges, according to the Minnesota Constitution." (b) The director must distribute the signs under this section to the owner or operator of retail petroleum dispensers. To the extent possible, the director must coordinate the distribution of signs with other duties the director may have involving retail petroleum dispensers. (c) If the amount of the gasoline tax described in paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), changes, the director must distribute revised signs to reflect the updated gasoline tax amounts within 12 calendar months of the change. (d) The director is prohibited from assessing any penalty, fine, or fee on the owner or operator of a retail petroleum dispenser that has a missing, destroyed, defaced, or otherwise damaged gas tax sign. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Gas tax on sales receipt. new text end new text begin The director must ensure that for any sale of regular or premium gasoline or diesel fuel from a retail petroleum dispenser, the retailer makes a sales receipt available to the purchaser that displays, in 11-point font or greater, the text required under subdivision 1, as modified by paragraph (c). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Rate of tax. deleted text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (b),deleted text end The gasoline excise tax is imposed at the following rates: (1) E85 is taxed at the rate of 17.75 cents per gallon; (2) M85 is taxed at the rate of 14.25 cents per gallon; and (3) all other gasoline is taxed at the rate of 25 cents per gallon. deleted text begin (b) Annually on August 1, the commissioner must determine the tax rate applicable to the sale of E85, M85, and all other gasoline subject to tax under this section for the upcoming 12-month period beginning on January 1. The adjusted rate must equal the current rate, multiplied by one plus the percentage increase, if any, in the Minnesota Highway Construction Cost Index for the reference year. The tax rate must be rounded to the nearest tenth of a cent. Each of the tax rates for E85, M85, and all other gasoline must not be lower than the respective rates specified in paragraph (a). Beginning with the calculation on August 1, 2025, the percentage change in each of the tax rates for E85, M85, and all other gasoline as a result of the requirements under this paragraph must not exceed three percent. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the Minnesota Highway Construction Cost Index is as determined by the commissioner of transportation; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) "reference year" means the 12-month period ending on June 30 two years prior to the year in which the calculation is made. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.08, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Rate of tax. (a) deleted text begin Subject to paragraph (b),deleted text end The special fuel excise tax is imposed at the following rates: (1) liquefied petroleum gas or propane is taxed at the rate of 18.75 cents per gallon; (2) liquefied natural gas is taxed at the rate of 15 cents per gallon; (3) compressed natural gas is taxed at the rate of $1.974 per thousand cubic feet or 25 cents per gasoline equivalent; and (4) all other special fuel is taxed at the same rate as the gasoline excise tax as specified in section 296A.07, subdivision 2. deleted text begin (b) Annually on August 1, the commissioner must determine the tax rate applicable to the sale of E85, M85, and all other gasoline subject to tax under this section for the upcoming 12-month period beginning on January 1. The rate must be adjusted as provided in section 296A.07, subdivision 3, paragraph (b). The tax rate must be rounded to the nearest tenth of a cent. Each of the tax rates for liquefied natural gas or propane, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural gas, and all other special fuel must not be lower than the respective rates specified in paragraph (a). deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The tax is payable in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end For purposes of this subdivision, "gasoline equivalent," as defined by the National Conference on Weights and Measures, is 5.66 pounds of natural gas or 126.67 cubic feet. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end